Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.01, subdivision 12a, is amended to read: Subd. 12a. Park zone. "Park zone" means an area designated as a public park by the federal government, the state, a local unit of government, a park district board, a park and recreation board in a city of the first class, or a federally recognized Indian Tribe. "Park zone" includes the area within deleted text begin 300deleted text end new text begin 100new text end feet deleted text begin or one city block, whichever distance is greater,deleted text end of the park boundary. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.01, subdivision 14a, is amended to read: Subd. 14a. School zone. "School zone" means: (1) any property owned, leased, or controlled by a school district or an organization operating a nonpublic school, as defined in section 123B.41, subdivision 9, where an elementary, middle, secondary school, secondary vocational center or other school providing educational services in grade one through grade 12 is located, or used for educational purposes, or where extracurricular or cocurricular activities are regularly provided; (2) the area surrounding school property as described in clause (1) to a distance of deleted text begin 300deleted text end new text begin 100new text end feet deleted text begin or one city block, whichever distance is greater,deleted text end beyond the school property; and (3) the area within a school bus when that bus is being used to transport one or more elementary or secondary school students. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.01, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Public housing zone. "Public housing zone" means any public housing project or development administered by a local housing agency, plus the area within deleted text begin 300deleted text end new text begin 100new text end feet of the property's boundarydeleted text begin , or one city block, whichever distance is greaterdeleted text end .